dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="yv/as__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="isa__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>des</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>de</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nde</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ndes</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tv/inga__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>ingas</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inga</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingats</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungits</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingat</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungit</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inga</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingat</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unget</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingats</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungets</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingad</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungen</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingads</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungens</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingade</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungna</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingades</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungnas</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingade</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungne</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingades</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungnes</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingade</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungna</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingades</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungnas</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingade</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungna</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingades</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ungnas</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingades</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>angs</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingade</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ang</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unges</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unge</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingande</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingandes</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingas</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ingar</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inges</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>inge</l><r>inga<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="flabba"><i>flabba</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grönska"><i>grönska</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kongressa"><i>kongressa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="löpna"><i>löpna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yvas"><i>yv</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gulla"><i>gulla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="valfuska"><i>valfuska</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="drumla"><i>drumla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="loska"><i>loska</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hissna"><i>hissna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="borttorka"><i>borttorka</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ejakulera"><i>ejakulera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="näcka"><i>näcka</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kallprata"><i>kallprata</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="orera"><i>orera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meckla"><i>meckla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gigga"><i>gigga</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glimma"><i>glimma</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="längas"><i>läng</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blarra"><i>blarra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="replikera"><i>replikera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rocka"><i>rocka</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konsertera"><i>konsertera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klaffa"><i>klaffa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dejsa"><i>dejsa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="förstöras"><i>förstör</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klirra"><i>klirra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vibrera"><i>vibrera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flexa"><i>flexa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blunda"><i>blunda</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blaska"><i>blaska</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="semestra"><i>semestra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="röstmaximera"><i>röstmaximera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="innebrännas"><i>innebränn</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrinna"><i>skrinna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="schabbla"><i>schabbla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="twista"><i>twista</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="runga"><i>runga</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="böka"><i>böka</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crawla"><i>crawla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sittupa"><i>sittupa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gippa"><i>gippa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="briljera"><i>briljera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mixtra"><i>mixtra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kvarta"><i>kvarta</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lisma"><i>lisma</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="djärvas"><i>djärv</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slamra"><i>slamra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bortmota"><i>bortmota</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="platsa"><i>platsa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="systemera"><i>systemera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hovra"><i>hovra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gagga"><i>gagga</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kontra"><i>kontra</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mumla"><i>mumla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tvinga"><i>tv</i><par n="tv/inga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avtvinga"><i>avtv</i><par n="tv/inga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klafsa"><i>klafsa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="båta"><i>båta</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="betvinga"><i>betv</i><par n="tv/inga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kåsera"><i>kåsera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="glipa"><i>glipa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="posera"><i>posera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pissa"><i>pissa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blygas"><i>blyg</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bulna"><i>bulna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="flöda"><i>flöda</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påtvinga"><i>påtv</i><par n="tv/inga__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="intala"><i>intala</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tremulera"><i>tremulera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="knega"><i>knega</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="borttappa"><i>borttappa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ömma"><i>ömma</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hafsa"><i>hafsa</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kandidera"><i>kandidera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="urinera"><i>urinera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hjula"><i>hjula</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mygla"><i>mygla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="behövas"><i>behöv</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kela"><i>kela</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vackla"><i>vackla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sagga"><i>sagga</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ratscha"><i>ratscha</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krävas"><i>kräv</i><par n="yv/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dröna"><i>dröna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skymla"><i>skymla</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fyllna"><i>fyllna</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pola"><i>pola</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tölta"><i>tölta</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="plikta"><i>plikta</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="resonera"><i>resonera</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="instunda"><i>instunda</i><par n="isa__vblex"/></e>
